Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201681-2014.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-2014 to 81-2041 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act.

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 33;

Laws 1997, LB 624, § 28;

Laws 1998, LB 532, § 9;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 64;

Laws 2001, LB 408, § 20;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 48;

Laws 2007, LB324, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 40;

Laws 2016, LB467, § 2.
April 19, 2016